Oklahoma, session 2026, SB549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 813, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 813. Every A. Any person who willfully, in any manner,


advises, encourages, abets, or assists another person in taking his


or her own life, is shall, upon conviction, be guilty of aiding


suicide of a felony punishable by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand

Req. No. 592 Page 1


Dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment in the custody of the Department


of Corrections for not less than seven (7) years, or by both such


fine and imprisonment.


B. Any person guilty of a felony offense pursuant to Section


1172 of this title that can be shown to be the proximate cause of


the suicide of the victim of such offense shall, upon conviction, be


guilty of an offense under subsection A of this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 815, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 815. Every A. Any person who willfully aids another in


attempting to take his or her own life, in any manner which by the


preceding sections described in Section 813 or 814 of this title


that would have amounted to aiding suicide if the person assisted


had actually taken his or her own life, is shall, upon conviction,


be guilty of aiding an attempt at suicide a felony punishable by a


fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment in


the custody of the Department of Corrections not to exceed two (2)


years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


B. Any person guilty of a felony offense pursuant to Section


1172 of this title that can be shown to be the proximate cause of


the attempted suicide of the victim of such offense shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of an offense under subsection A of this


section.



Req. No. 592 Page 2


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1172, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1172. A. It shall be unlawful for a person who to, by


means of a telecommunication or, other electronic communication


device, or online platform, willfully either:


1. Makes Make any comment, request, suggestion, or proposal


which is obscene, lewd, lascivious, filthy, or indecent with intent


to harass or threaten to inflict injury, physical harm, or severe


emotional distress to any person;


2. Makes Make a telecommunication or other electronic


communication, or post on an online platform including text, sound,


or images with intent to terrify, intimidate or harass, or threaten


to inflict injury or, physical harm, or severe emotional distress to


any person or property of that person;


3. Makes Make a telecommunication or other electronic


communication, or post on an online platform whether or not


conversation ensues, with intent to put the party called any person


in fear of physical harm or death;


4. Makes Make a telecommunication or other electronic


communication, or post on an online platform including text, sound,


or images whether or not conversation ensues, without disclosing the


identity of the person making the call or, communication, or post


and with intent to annoy, abuse, threaten, or harass any person at


which the called number communication is directed;

Req. No. 592 Page 3


5. Knowingly permits permit any telecommunication or, other


electronic communication, or online platform account under the


control of the person to be used for any purpose prohibited by this


section; and or


6. In conspiracy or concerted action with other persons, makes


make repeated or simultaneous calls or, electronic communications,


or simultaneous calls or electronic communications posts on an


online platform solely to harass any person at the called number(s)


number or on the online platform.


B. As used in this section, “telecommunication”:


1. “Online platform” means a website or online application that


is open to the public, allows a user to create an account, and


enables users to communicate with other users for the primary


purpose of posting information, comments, messages, or images; and


2. “Telecommunication” and “electronic communication” mean any


type of telephonic, electronic, or radio communications, or


transmission of signs, signals, data, writings, images and sounds,


or intelligence of any nature by telephone, including cellular


telephones, wire, cable, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or


photo-optical system or the creation, display, management, storage,


processing, transmission, or distribution of images, text, voice,


video, or data by wire, cable, or wireless means, including the


Internet. The term includes a:


1. A

Req. No. 592 Page 4


a. communication initiated by electronic mail, instant


message, network call, or facsimile machine including


text, sound, or images;,


2. A


b. communication made to a pager;, or


3. A


c. communication including text, sound, or images posted


to a social media or other public media source.


C. Use of a telephone or other electronic communications


facility under this section shall include all use made of such a


facility between the points of origin and reception. Any offense


under this section is a continuing offense and shall be deemed to


have been committed at either the place of origin or the place of


reception.


D. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, any


1. Any person who is convicted of under the provisions of


subsection A of this section, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor


punishable by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),


imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one (1) year, or by


both such fine and imprisonment.


E. 2. Any person who is convicted of a second offense under the


provisions of subsection A of this section shall be guilty of a


felony punishable by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00), imprisonment in the custody of the Department of

Req. No. 592 Page 5


Corrections not to exceed two (2) years, or by both such fine and


imprisonment.


3. Any person who is convicted of a third or subsequent offense


under the provisions of subsection A of this section shall be guilty


of a felony punishable by a fine not less than Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00) and not more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars


($100,000.00), or by imprisonment in the custody of the Department


of Corrections not to exceed ten (10) years, or by both such fine


and imprisonment.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1953, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1953. A. It shall be unlawful to:


1. Willfully, and without authorization, gain or attempt to


gain access to and damage, modify, alter, delete, destroy, copy,


make use of, use malicious computer programs on, disclose or take


possession of a computer, computer system, computer network, data or


any other property;


2. Use a computer, computer system, computer network or any


other property as hereinbefore defined for the purpose of devising


or executing a scheme or artifice with the intent to defraud,


deceive, extort or for the purpose of controlling or obtaining


money, property, data, services or other thing of value by means of


a false or fraudulent pretense or representation;



Req. No. 592 Page 6


3. Willfully exceed the limits of authorization and damage,


modify, alter, destroy, copy, delete, disclose or take possession of


a computer, computer system, computer network, data or any other


property;


4. Willfully and without authorization, gain or attempt to gain


access to a computer, computer system, computer network, data or any


other property;


5. Willfully and without authorization use or cause to be used


computer services;


6. Willfully and without authorization disrupt or cause the


disruption of computer services or deny or cause the denial of


access or other computer services to an authorized user of a


computer, computer system or computer network, other than an


authorized entity acting for a legitimate business purpose with the


effective consent of the owner;


7. Willfully and without authorization provide or assist in


providing a means of accessing a computer, computer system, data or


computer network in violation of this section;


8. Willfully use a computer, computer system, or computer


network, or other electronic device or system to annoy, abuse,


threaten, or harass another person;


9. Willfully use a computer, computer system, or computer


network, or other electronic device or system to put another person


in fear of physical harm or death; and

Req. No. 592 Page 7


10. Willfully use a computer, computer system, computer


network, or other electronic device or system to encourage another


person to harm himself or herself or to commit suicide; and


11. Willfully solicit another, regardless of any financial


consideration or exchange of property, of any acts described in


paragraphs 1 through 9 10 of this subsection.


B. Any person convicted of violating paragraph 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 9


or 10, or 11 of subsection A of this section shall be guilty of a


felony punishable as provided in Section 1955 of this title.


C. Any person convicted of violating paragraph 4, 5 or 8 of


subsection A of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.


D. Nothing in the Oklahoma Computer Crimes Act shall be


construed to prohibit the monitoring of computer usage of, or the


denial of computer or Internet access to, a child by a parent, legal


guardian, legal custodian, or foster parent. As used in this


subsection, “child” shall mean any person less than eighteen (18)


years of age.


E. Nothing in the Oklahoma Computer Crimes Act shall be


construed to prohibit testing by an authorized entity, the purpose


of which is to provide to the owner or operator of the computer,


computer system or computer network an evaluation of the security of


the computer, computer system or computer network against real or


imagined threats or harms.



Req. No. 592 Page 8


SECTION 5. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Sections 817 and 818,


are hereby repealed.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-592 CN 1/19/2025 5:38:32 AM







































Req. No. 592 Page 9